Louisiana, session 2026, SB302.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:477(1) and 621.1 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§477. Judicial districts
There shall be forty-one judicial districts in the state and each district shall
be composed as follows:
* * *
(1) The parish of Caddo shall compose the First District. The First District
shall consist of three elections sections with one judgeship that shall be elected
from the district at large. Election section one shall consist of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 5,
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-267 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 302
6, 25, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 53, 54, 55, 57,
58, 60, 61, 65, 66, 67, 71, 73A & 73B, 80, 81, 82A & 82B, 83A & 83B, 84, 85A &
85B, 86, 96, 98, 130, 131, 135, 137A & 137B, and 140 of Caddo Parish. Election
section two shall consist of Precincts 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19,
20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 26, 27, 28, 35, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52, 56A & 56B, 59, 62, 63, 64,
68, 70, 72, 74, 76A & 76B, 77, 99, 126, 127, 128, and 129 of Caddo Parish. Election
section three shall consist of Precincts 4, 69, 75, 78, 79, 87, 88, 89A & 89B & 89C,
90A & 90B, 91A & 91B, 92, 93, 94, 95A & 95B, 97A & 97B, 122, 123, 124, 125,
132A & 132B, 133, 134, 136, 138, 139, 141, 142, 143, 144, 145, 146, 147, 149, 150,
151, 152, 153, 154, 155, 156, 157, 158, and 159 of Caddo Parish.
* * *
§621.1. First Judicial District
The First Judicial District Court shall have eleven judges. Four judges shall
be elected from election section one, three judges shall be elected from election
section two, and four three judges shall be elected from election section three, and
one judge shall be elected at large. The judgeships designated as Divisions B, D,
G, and J are assigned to election section one of the First Judicial District; the
judgeships designated as C, H, and I are assigned to election section two of the
First Judicial District; and the judgeships designated as A, E, and K are
assigned to election section three of the First Judicial District; and the judgeship
designated as Division F shall be elected at large.
Section 2. Section 3(E) of Act No. 145 of the 1994 Third Extraordinary Session of
the Legislature of Louisiana is hereby repealed.
Section 3. The election to fill the judgeship currently designated as Division F shall
be held at the regularly scheduled election date as an at large election provided the judgeship
is vacated due to the death, resignation, retirement, or incapacity of the judge currently
serving in Division F or if the judge currently serving in Division F does not run for re-
election. Any subsequent election for a judge to Division F shall be held from the District
at large if the currently presiding judgeship has been vacated due to the death, resignation,
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-267 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 302
retirement, or incapacity of the judge.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the following such approval.